en: pork collagen, pork casing, pork gut
bg: свински колаген
de: Schweinedarm
es: Tripa de cerdo, tripa natural de cerdo, tripa natural de cerdo de calibre estrecho
fi: siansuoli, porsaansuoli, porsaan suolessa
fr: boyau de porc
hr: svinjski kolagen
hu: sertésbél, disznóbél
it: budello di maiale
nl: varkenscollageen, varkencollageen, varkensdarm
pl: jelito wieprzowe, jelita wieprzowe, kolagen wieprzowy

en: sausage, sausages
de: Wurst, Würstchen
hr: kobasica
it: salsiccia
nl: worstjes
pl: kiełbasa, kiełbasy

en: merguez, Merguez sausage
xx: merguez
ar: مرقاز
eo: Mergezo
fr: merguez
he: מרגז
ja: メルゲーズ
uk: Мергези

en: raw Merguez sausage
fr: Merguez crue
hr: sirova merguez kobasica
it: salsiccia cruda di Merguez

en: botifarra
ca: botifarra
es: butifarra, butifarras
hr: botifarra
it: botifarra

en: black botifarra
ca: botifarra negra
de: schwarze Botifarra
hr: crna botifara
it: botifarra nera

en: Cured sausage
es: Embutido curado
fr: Saucisson
hr: sušena kobasica
it: salsiccia stagionata

en: Smoked cured sausage
fr: Saucisson fumé, saucissons fumés
hr: dimljena sušena kobasica
it: salsiccia affumicata stagionata

en: salami
xx: salami
ar: سلامي
be: Салямі
bg: Салам
co: Salamu
cs: salám
de: Salami
el: Σαλάμι
eo: salamo
es: salame
et: Salaami
fa: سالامی
gl: Salame
he: סלמי
hr: salama
hu: szalámi
hy: Սալյամի
it: Salame
ja: サラミ
ka: სალიამი
kk: Салями
ko: 살라미
mk: Салама
nl: Salami
pl: salami
pt: salame
ro: Salam
ru: салями
sk: Saláma
sr: Салама
tr: Salam
ur: سالامی
zh: 莎樂美腸

en: pepperoni
xx: pepperoni
ar: ببروني
de: Pepperoni
el: πεπερόνι
fa: پپرونی
fi: pepperoni, pepperonisalami
he: פפרוני
hi: पेपरोनी
hr: feferoni
hy: պեպերոնի
it: salame piccante
ja: ペパロニ
ko: 페퍼로니
ms: peperoni
ne: पेपरोनी
ru: пеперони
uk: пепероні
zh: 意大利红肠

en: prepared meat, processed meat, cured meat
fr: charcuterie
hr: pripremljeno meso
it: carne preparata

en: mortadella
xx: mortadella
bg: мортадела
de: Mortadella
es: mortadela
fr: mortadelle
hr: mortadela
pl: mortadela
pt: mortadela

en: smoked sausage
de: geräucherte Wurst
es: salchicha ahumada
fr: saucisses fumées
hr: dimljena kobasica
it: salsiccia affumicata
nl: rookworst

en: Garlic sausage
de: Knoblauchwurst
es: Salchicha de ajo
fr: Saucisson à l'ail
hr: češnjak kobasica
it: Salsiccia all'aglio
nl: knoflookworst
pt: Linguiça de alho

en: pork sausage, pork sausages
de: Wurst aus Schweinefleisch, Wurst vom Schwein
fr: saucisse de porc
hr: svinjska kobasica
it: salsiccia di maiale
pl: kiełbasa wieprzowa

en: Ham sausages
fr: Saucisses de jambon pur porc
hr: kobasice od šunke
it: salsicce di prosciutto

en: Frankfurter sausages
fr: Saucisses de Francfort
hr: frankfurtske kobasice
it: würstel

en: Morteaux sausage
fr: Saucisse de Morteau
hr: morteaux kobasica
it: salsiccia di Morteaux

en: Montbeliard sausage
fr: Saucisse de Montbéliard
hr: montbeliard kobasica
it: salsiccia di Montbéliard

en: sausage skin
da: pølseskind
sv: korvskinn, skinn